Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 2. Additional Cigarette Taxes.

Sec. 43.50.190.
Additional tax levy on cigarettes.

There is levied an excise tax on each cigarette imported or acquired in this state,

after December 31, 2004, but before July 1, 2006, 42 mills;

after June 30, 2006, but before July 1, 2007, 52 mills;

after June 30, 2007, 62 mills.

The tax levied by this section is in addition to the tax levied by AS

43.50.010

—

43.50.180

. The tax shall be administered and collected in the same manner as the tax levied by AS

43.50.010

—

43.50.180

, except that receipts from the tax shall be deposited in the general fund. The penalties provided in AS 43.05 and this chapter apply to the tax levied in this section.

The tax imposed under (a) of this section does not apply to the first 400 cigarettes personally transported into the state by an individual for that individual’s personal consumption during the calendar month.

A portion of the annual proceeds of the tax levied under (a) of this section equal to 8.9 percent of the total proceeds of the tax shall be deposited into the tobacco use education and cessation fund established in AS

37.05.580

. This deposit shall be in addition to any sums deposited into the fund under AS

37.05.580

(a).

In this section, “cigarette” has the meaning given in AS

43.50.170

.

History.

(§§ 1, 2 ch 53 SLA 1961; am § 40 ch 113 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 24 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 96 SLA 1989; am §§ 14, 15 ch 109 SLA 2003; am §§ 18 — 20 ch 1 FSSLA 2004; am § 46 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Contingent amendment of subsection (a). —

Under secs. 4, 7, and 10,
ch. 48, SLA 1997, as amended by sec. 42, ch. 1, FSSLA 2004, the rate in subsection (a) is modified on the later of (1) the date a court enters a final judgment that the amendment made to
AS

43.50.090(a)

by sec. 2,
ch. 48, SLA 1997 changing the rate of taxation on cigarettes violates the prohibition set out in
art. IX, sec. 7, Constitution of the State of Alaska, against dedication of the proceeds of a state tax or license, and (2) the expiration of any time for appeal of that judgment, or upon entry of a final order on the appeal that
AS

43.50.090(a)

, as amended by sec. 2,
ch. 48, SLA 1997, violates
art. IX, sec. 7, Constitution of the State of Alaska. Section 42, ch. 1, FSSLA 2004 contingently sets the modified rates of taxation on cigarettes under subsection (a) of this section at 77.5 mills after December 31, 2004, and before July 1, 2006; at 87.5 mills after June 30, 2006, and before July 1, 2007; and at 97.5 mills after June 30, 2007.
Under sec. 8,
ch. 48, SLA 1997, if this contingent amendment takes effect, the contingent amendment is retroactive to October 1, 1997, and 35.5 mills per cigarette of the tax levied after October 1, 1997 under
AS 43.50.090(a), as amended by sec. 2,
ch. 48, SLA 1997, shall be credited to the tax levied under subsection (a) of this section, as contingently amended by sec. 4,
ch. 48, SLA 1997, and sec. 42, ch. 1, FSSLA 2004. As of May 2022, the contingencies had not been satisfied.

Cross references. —

For legislative intent in connection with the 1985 amendment to (a) of this section, see § 1, ch. 24, SLA 1985 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For taxation, see 15 AAC 50, art. 2.

Sec. 43.50.200.
Nonparticipating manufacturer equity excise tax.

There is levied an excise tax of 12.5 mills on each cigarette imported or acquired in this state from a nonparticipating manufacturer.

The tax levied by this section is in addition to the taxes levied by AS

43.50.010

—

43.50.190

. The tax shall be administered and collected in the same manner as the taxes levied by AS

43.50.010

—

43.50.180

, except that receipts from the tax shall be deposited in the general fund. The penalties provided in AS 43.05 and this chapter apply to the tax levied in this section.

In this section, “nonparticipating manufacturer” means a tobacco product manufacturer as defined in AS

45.53.100

that is not a participating manufacturer as that term is defined in sec. II(jj) of the Master Settlement Agreement.

History.

(§ 21 ch 1 FSSLA 2004)